District of Columbia statutes.
9-1201.03

Further laying of street railroads prohibited.

No further street railroads shall be laid down in the City of Washington without the consent of Congress.

R.S., D.C., § 224
1981 Ed., § 7-1403.
1973 Ed., § 7-1203.